Missouri, session 2026, HB2563.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 536.032 and 536.033, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 536.032 and 536.033, to read as follows:
536.032. Upon the filing of a request by a state agency with the joint committee on
administrative rules and the secretary of state concurrently, and after publication in the
Missouri Register, the secretary of state shall have the authority to make nonsubstantive
changes to the code of state regulations to update changes in department or division name
information in response to statutory changes or executive orders[, or to]; changes in state
agency addresses, state agency telephone numbers, email addresses, or state agency website
addresses; or changes in intersectional references.
536.033. 1. Copies or subscription of the register or code shall be made available to
the public by the secretary of state upon request for a reasonable charge to be established by
the secretary of state, not to exceed the actual cost of publishing and delivery.
2. All fees collected from the sale of the Missouri Register or the code of state
regulations by the secretary of state shall be deposited to general revenue.
3. The secretary of state may correct typographical or spelling errors or
intersectional references in the publication of any rule, notice of proposed rulemaking, or
order of rulemaking.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.